Georgia, session 2025_26, SB173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 3 of Chapter 11 of Title 9 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
pleadings and motions, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"9-11-16.1.
(a) In the event that a superior court judge or a state court judge fails to rule upon a
properly served motion before him or her to which no objection has been filed by any party
or any valid intervenor within 90 days of the filing of such motion, the moving party may
file a notice of uncontested motion with such judge.
S. B. 173
- 1 -

LC 55 0401
(b) Should a judge continue to fail to rule upon a motion before him or her within seven
days of the filing of a notice of uncontested motion pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code
section, such motion shall thereafter be deemed granted by such judge.
(c) In the event that a judge has a motion deemed granted pursuant to subsection (b) of this
Code section in a second matter before such judge, the chief judge of the jurisdiction at
issue shall conduct a review of the docket management techniques and procedures of such
judge and shall issue a report of his or her findings.
(d) Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit any court from conducting any review of
its own operations of its own initiative."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 173
- 2 -